Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2907HH (3) 91 cm/jh H.F. 591 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âExpedited Contempt Appeal Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The general assembly finds 3 that individuals held in contempt of court may face immediate 4 incarceration or penalties without a timely opportunity for 5 appeal. Given that contempt of court rulings can arise from 6 minor infractions, such as accidental disruptions, an expedited 7 appeal process is necessary to ensure due process and prevent 8 potential judicial overreach. This Act establishes a mechanism 9 for prompt judicial review of contempt orders. 10 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 665.13 Expedited appeal process. 11 1. A person found in contempt of court and sentenced 12 to incarceration or a fine shall have the right to file an 13 expedited appeal within four hours of the ruling. 14 2. Upon receiving a notice of appeal, the appellate court 15 shall schedule a hearing within twenty-four hours of the notice 16 to review the contempt finding and any associated penalties. 17 3. The appellate court shall have the authority to stay 18 enforcement of the contempt sentence pending appeal and to 19 overturn, modify, or affirm the ruling based on the merits of 20 the case. 21 4. The supreme court shall prescribe rules and procedures to 22 ensure the efficient handling of expedited contempt appeals, 23 including electronic filing options and emergency review 24 panels. 25 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 26 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 27